Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-266
Streets; lights; telephone lines; regulation.

The mayor and city council of a city of the primary class shall have power to regulate and provide for the lighting of streets, laying down gas, water, and other pipes, and the erection of lampposts, electric towers, or other apparatus. The mayor and city council may regulate the sale and use of gas and electric lights and fix and determine the price of gas, the charge of electric lights and power, and the rents of gas meters within the city, and regulate the inspection thereof. The mayor and city council may regulate telephone service and the use of telephones within the city, prohibit or regulate the erection of telephone or electric wire poles or other poles for whatsoever purpose desired or used in the public grounds, streets, or alleys, and the placing of wires thereon, require the removal from the public grounds, streets, or alleys of any or all such poles, and require the removal and placing under ground of any or all telephone or electric wires.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XIII, p. 130;

R.S.1913, § 4476;

C.S.1922, § 3861;

C.S.1929, § 15-264;

R.S.1943, § 15-266;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 76.
November 14, 2020